Montana, session 2025, SB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Direction to the director. (1) In implementing [section 2] 47-1-105(1)(E)
AND (1)(F), the director of the office of the state public defender shall:
(1) limit the office's reliance on and utilization of contract attorneys to the extent ethically and
practically possible. ; AND
(2) In implementing [section 2(1)(f)], the director shallcollaborate with the department of public
health and human services to leverage and maximize federal resources under Title IV-E of the Social Security
Act.

Section 2. Section 47-1-105, MCA, is amended to read:
"47-1-105. Director -- duties -- report -- standards for public defender services qualification and
training. (1) The director shall supervise and direct the system. In addition to other duties assigned pursuant to
this chapter, the director shall:
(a) establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of the public defender division
administrator provided for in 47-1-201, hire the public defender division administrator after considering qualified
applicants, and regularly evaluate the performance of the public defender division administrator;
(b) establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of the appellate defender division
administrator provided for in 47-1-301, hire the appellate defender division administrator after considering
qualified applicants, and regularly evaluate the performance of the appellate defender division administrator;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 151

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0151.3
(c) establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of the conflict defender division
administrator provided for in 47-1-401, hire the conflict defender division administrator after considering
qualified applicants, and regularly evaluate the performance of the conflict defender division administrator; and
(d) establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of the central services division
administrator provided for in 47-1-119, hire the central services division administrator after considering qualified
applicants, and regularly evaluate the performance of the central services division administrator;
(e) establish no more than two organizational TRIAL units to provide counsel to parents, guardians,
and legal custodians as required under 41-3-425(2)(a) that must include a managing attorney for each unit; and
(f) establish an organizational TRIAL unit to provide counsel to children as required under 41-3-425
that must include a managing attorney for the unit.
(2) The director shall establish statewide standards for the qualification and training of attorneys
providing public defender services to ensure that services are provided by competent counsel and in a manner
that is fair and consistent throughout the state. The standards must take into consideration:
(a) the level of education and experience that is necessary to competently handle certain cases
and case types, such as criminal, juvenile, abuse and neglect, civil commitment, capital, and other case types,
including cases on appeal, in order to provide effective assistance of counsel;
(b) acceptable caseloads and workload monitoring protocols to ensure that public defender
workloads are manageable;
(c) access to and use of necessary professional services, such as paralegal, investigator, and
other services that may be required to support a public defender in a case;
(d) continuing education requirements for public defenders and support staff;
(e) practice standards;
(f) performance criteria; and
(g) performance evaluation protocols.
(3) In addition to the director's duties to establish statewide standards under subsection (2), the
director shall establish specific standards for the qualification and training of attorneys providing public defender
services to a child in an abuse and neglect case. The standards must take into consideration:
(a) additional training required to competently represent a child, which may include:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 151

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0151.3
(i) methods for communicating with a child in a developmentally appropriate manner;
(ii) methods for presenting child testimony and alternatives to direct testimony;
(iii) early childhood, child, and adolescent development;
(iv) the dynamics of abuse and neglect, child sexual abuse, trauma, grief, and attachment;
(v) mental health issues, substance abuse issues, and the impact of domestic violence; and
(vi) available services and community resources for families;
(b) continuing education requirements specific to representing a child; and
(c) practice standards for representing a child, which may include:
(i) ensuring the child understands the role of counsel in the proceedings, including counsel's duty
to maintain confidentiality, provide loyal and independent legal representation, and to advocate for the child's
position;
(ii) taking all steps reasonably necessary to represent the child in the proceedings, including but
not limited to interviewing the child, advising the child of the child's rights, educating the child about the legal
process, informing the child of the child's options, counseling the child's decisionmaking, preparing a case
theory and strategy, preparing for and participating in negotiations and hearings, and drafting and submitting
motions, memoranda, and orders;
(iii) reviewing and accepting or declining, after appropriate consultation with the child, any
proposed stipulation for an order affecting the child and explaining to the court the basis for any opposition to
the proposed stipulation;
(iv) taking action counsel considers appropriate to expedite the proceedings and the resolution of
contested issues;
(v) maintaining frequent and intentional contact with the child, at a minimum, prior to and after
each court hearing, after every placement change, and no less than one in-person meeting every 3 months;
(vi) in accordance with the rules of professional conduct, communicating and collaborating with all
other parties to the case;
(vii) investigating and taking necessary legal action regarding the child's medical, mental health,
social, and educational needs and overall well-being;
(viii) visiting the home, residence, or any prospective residence of the child, including each time the
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 151

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0151.3
placement is changed;
(ix) seeking court orders or taking any other necessary steps in accordance with the child's
direction to ensure that the child's health, mental health, educational, developmental, cultural, and placement
needs are met; and
(x) ensuring opportunities for the meaningful participation of the child in court hearings and other
case events, including advising the child of the right to participate in the proceedings. If the child does not want
to participate or wishes to waive the right to attend after being informed of the right and the nature of the
proceedings, counsel for the child shall inform the court of the child's decision not to attend.
(4) The director shall also:
(a) review and approve the strategic plan and budget based on proposals submitted by the public
defender division administrator, the central services division administrator, the appellate defender division
administrator, and the conflict defender division administrator;
(b) review and approve any proposal to create permanent staff positions;
(c) establish policies and procedures for handling excess caseloads;
(d) establish policies and procedures to ensure that detailed expenditure and caseload data is
collected, recorded, and reported to support strategic planning efforts for the system; and
(e) examine workloads and workload standards for all levels within the office of state public
defender and include its findings in the biennial report provided for in 47-1-125.
(5) The office of state public defender shall adopt administrative rules pursuant to the Montana
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this chapter."

NEW SECTION. SECTION 3. TRANSITION. NOTWITHSTANDING THE EFFECTIVE DATE IN [SECTION 5], FOR
THE PURPOSES OF [THIS ACT] THE OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER SHALL CREATE 21 NEW STAFF POSITIONS, 10
OF WHICH MUST BE CREATED DURING THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, AND 11 OF WHICH MUST BE CREATED
DURING THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 151

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0151.3

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 151